Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-938
Mental health board; person released from treatment; compliance with conditions of release; conduct hearing; make determination.

The mental health board shall, upon the motion of the county attorney, or may upon its own motion, hold a hearing to determine whether a person who has been ordered by the board to receive inpatient or outpatient treatment is adhering to the conditions of his or her release from such treatment, including the taking of medication. The subject of such hearing shall be accorded all rights guaranteed to a subject under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act, and such hearing shall apply the standards used in all other hearings held pursuant to the act. If the mental health board concludes from the evidence at the hearing that there is clear and convincing evidence that the subject is mentally ill and dangerous, the board shall so find and shall within forty-eight hours enter an order of final disposition providing for the treatment of such person in accordance with section 71-925.

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1080;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 58.